North Carolina statutes. Chapter 33. Guardian and Ward. [Repealed]
§§ 33-1 through 33-77.
[Repealed]

Repealed and recodified.

Cross References.

For the North Carolina Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, see now Chapter 33A,

G.S. 33A-1

et seq.

As to incompetency and guardianship, see now Chapter 35A,

G.S. 35A-1101

et seq.

Editor’s Note.

Articles 1 to 4, 5 to 8, and 11 of Chapter 33 were repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 550, s. 10, effective October 1, 1987. Article 4A was recodified as

G.S. 35A-1360

and 35A-1361 by Session Laws 1987, c. 550, s. 9, effective October 1, 1987. Articles 9 and 10 were repealed by Session Laws 1965, c. 815, s. 4. Article 12 was repealed by Session Laws 1987, c. 563, s. 1, effective October 1, 1987.

Session Laws 1987, c. 550, s. 11 changed the title of this Chapter to read “Uniform Gifts to Minors Act.” However, in view of the repeal of Article 12 of this Chapter by Session Laws 1987, c. 563, which added a new Chapter 33A, the North Carolina Uniform Transfers to Minors Act, at the direction of the Revisor of Statutes no change has been made in the title of Chapter 33.